Massachusetts, session 194th, H393.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 140 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking Section 57 in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the 
following new section:- 
Section 57. (a) No person, except one whose principal business is the manufacture and 
sale of new motor vehicles but who incidentally acquires and sells second hand vehicles, or a 
person whose principal business is financing the purchase of or insuring motor vehicles but who 
incidentally acquires and sells second hand vehicles, shall engage in the business of buying, 
selling, exchanging or assembling second hand motor vehicles or parts thereof or allow any 
property under his control to be used as a place of sale or display of motor vehicles without 
securing a license as providing in section fifty-nine. This section shall apply to any person 

of 2 11 engaged in the business of conducting auctions for the sale of motor vehicles, and to any person 
engaged in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles and who, as an incident to such 
business, sells or offers to sell any such lease or rental vehicle to the public. All sales of second-
hand motor vehicles or parts thereof made by any person referred to in this section shall be 
reported weekly to the registrar of motor vehicles on such forms as may be prescribed by him. 
(b) A fee in the amount of $50 shall be charged to any individual who purchases a vehicle 
with a title that is assigned out of state. The fee shall be collected by the Auctioneer and the 
auction would be responsible to remit this fee on a monthly basis to Department of Professional 
Licensure.